Utah statutes.
20A-9-601.   Qualifying as a write-in candidate.

(1) (a)  Each person wishing to become a valid write-in candidate shall file a declaration of candidacy in person or through a designated agent for a candidate for President or Vice President of the United States with the appropriate filing officer not later than 30 days before the regular general election or 45 days before a municipal general election in which the person intends to be a write-in candidate.

(b) (i)  The filing officer shall:

(A)  read to the candidate the constitutional and statutory requirements for the office; and

(B)  ask the candidate whether or not the candidate meets the requirements.

(ii)  If the candidate cannot meet the requirements of office, the filing officer may not accept the write-in candidate's declaration of candidacy.

(2)  By November 1 of each regular general election year, the lieutenant governor shall certify to each county clerk the names of all write-in candidates who filed their declaration of candidacy with the lieutenant governor.

